Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201286-103
Definitions, where
found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Telecommunications
Regulation Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found
in sections 86-103.01 to 86-121 apply.

Laws 1986, LB 835, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 554;

Laws 1997, LB 660, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-802;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB715, § 2.
July 19, 2012